Wisconsin, session 2025, AB754.
do enact as follows:AB754,11Section 1. 609.803 of the statutes is created to read:AB754,2,32609.803 Coverage of sexually transmitted disease testing. Preferred 3provider plans and defined network plans are subject to s. 632.895 (13m).AB754,24Section 2. 632.895 (13m) of the statutes is created to read:AB754,2,85632.895 (13m) Sexually transmitted disease tests. (a) In this 6subsection, “home test kit” means a product that is used as a test, that is 7recommended by the federal centers for disease control and prevention guidelines 8or the U.S. preventive services task force, and that satisfies all of the following:AB754,2,1191. The product allows individuals to self-collect specimens for sexually 10transmitted diseases, including HIV, as defined in s. 252.01 (1m), outside of a 11clinical setting.AB754,2,15122. The product has been given a waiver of the federal clinical laboratory 13improvement amendments, has been approved or cleared by the federal food and 14drug administration, or has been developed by a laboratory in accordance with 15established regulations and quality standards.AB754,2,2016(b) Every disability insurance policy and every self-insured health plan of the 17state, or a county, city, village, town, or school district, that provides coverage of 18primary care or preventive services shall provide coverage of a home test kit, 19including any laboratory costs of processing the home test kit, if the home test kit 20meets all of the following criteria:AB754,3,211. The use of the home test kit is determined to be medically necessary or 2appropriate.AB754,3,532. The home test kit is ordered directly by a health care provider or furnished 4through a standing order for patient use based on clinical guidelines and individual 5patient needs.AB754,36Section 3. Initial applicability.AB754,3,97(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 8act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 9subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB754,3,1410(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 11agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 12policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 13on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 14modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB754,415Section 4. Effective date.AB754,3,1716(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 17publication.AB754,3,1818